Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. General Provisions.

Sec. 47.38.190.
Regulations.

The department may adopt regulations necessary to implement this chapter.

History.

(§ 39(c) ch 83 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

This section was enacted as uncodified law in sec. 39(c), ch. 83, SLA 2014; codified in 2014.

Sec. 47.38.199.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“commissioner” means the commissioner of health and social services;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services.

History.

(§ 34 ch 83 SLA 2014)